test/src/morphology/N-meer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - meer â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     meer+N+Sg+Nom: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Gen: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Acc: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Ill: meeru
     meer+N+Sg+Loc: meerast
     meer+N+Sg+Com: meerain
     meer+N+Ess: meeran
     meer+N+Par: meerad
     meer+N+Sg+Abe: meertää
     meer+N+Sg+Nom: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Gen: meerai
     meer+N+Sg+Acc: meeraid
     meer+N+Sg+Ill: meeraid
     meer+N+Sg+Loc: meerain
     meer+N+Sg+Com: meeraivui′m
     meer+N+Sg+Abe: meeraitää
